Illinois, session 104th, HB2815.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 12-3.8 and 12-3.9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.8)7    Sec. 12-3.8. Violation of a civil no contact order.8    (a) A person commits violation of a civil no contact order 9if:10        (1) he or she knowingly commits an act which was 11    prohibited by a court or fails to commit an act which was 12    ordered in violation of: 13            (A) a remedy of a valid civil no contact order 14        authorized under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact 15        Order Act or Section 112A-14.5 of the Code of Criminal 16        Procedure of 1963; or 17            (B) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 18        the remedies authorized under Section 213 of the Civil 19        No Contact Order Act or Section 112A-14.5 of the Code 20        of Criminal Procedure of 1963, or in a valid civil no 21        contact order, which is authorized under the laws of 22        another state, tribe, or United States territory; and 23        (2) the violation occurs after the offender has been   HB2815- 2 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1    served notice of the contents of the order under the Civil 2    No Contact Order Act, Article 112A of the Code of Criminal 3    Procedure of 1963, or any substantially similar statute of 4    another state, tribe, or United States territory, or 5    otherwise has acquired actual knowledge of the contents of 6    the order.7    A civil no contact order issued by a state, tribal, or 8territorial court shall be deemed valid if the issuing court 9had jurisdiction over the parties and matter under the law of 10the state, tribe, or territory. There shall be a presumption 11of validity when an order is certified and appears authentic 12on its face.13    (a-3) For purposes of this Section, a "civil no contact 14order" may have been issued in a criminal or civil proceeding.15    (a-5) Failure to provide reasonable notice and opportunity 16to be heard shall be an affirmative defense to any charge or 17process filed seeking enforcement of a foreign civil no 18contact order. 19    (b) Prosecution for a violation of a civil no contact 20order shall not bar a concurrent prosecution for any other 21crime, including any crime that may have been committed at the 22time of the violation of the civil no contact order. 23    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to diminish 24the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful 25orders through civil or criminal contempt proceedings.26    (d) A defendant who directed the actions of a third party   HB2815- 3 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1to violate this Section, under the principles of 2accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 3of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 4done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of 5the third party acting at the direction of the defendant. 6    (e) Sentence. Violation of a civil no contact order is a 7Class A misdemeanor. Violation of a civil no contact order is a 8Class 4 felony if the defendant has any prior conviction under 9Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.4 or any prior conviction under the law 10of another jurisdiction for an offense that could be charged 11in this State as domestic battery or violation of an order of 12protection. Violation of a civil no contact order is a Class 4 13felony if the defendant has any prior conviction under Section 148-4, 9-1, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-3.1, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 1511-1.60, 12-3.05, 12-3.3, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 20-1.1, or 24-1.2 or 16subsection (a-5) of Section 12-3.1, of a violation of any 17former law of this State that is substantially similar to any 18listed offense, or any prior conviction under the law of 19another jurisdiction for an offense that could be charged in 20this State as one of the offenses listed in this Section, when 21any of these offenses have been committed against a family or 22household member as defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of 23Criminal Procedure of 1963. The court shall impose a minimum 24penalty of 24 hours imprisonment for the respondent's second 25or subsequent violation of any civil no contact order, unless 26the court explicitly finds that an increased penalty or such   HB2815- 4 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1period of imprisonment would be manifestly unjust. In addition 2to any other penalties, the court may order the respondent to 3pay a fine as authorized under Section 5-9-1 of the Unified 4Code of Corrections or to make restitution to the victim under 5Section 5-5-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A violation 6of a civil no contact order is a Class A misdemeanor for a 7first violation, and a Class 4 felony for a second or 8subsequent violation. 9(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18.) 10    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.9)11    Sec. 12-3.9. Violation of a stalking no contact order.12    (a) A person commits violation of a stalking no contact 13order if:14        (1) he or she knowingly commits an act which was 15    prohibited by a court or fails to commit an act which was 16    ordered by a court in violation of: 17            (A) a remedy in a valid stalking no contact order 18        of protection authorized under Section 80 of the 19        Stalking No Contact Order Act or Section 112A-14.7 of 20        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963; or 21            (B) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 22        the remedies authorized under Section 80 of the 23        Stalking No Contact Order Act or Section 112A-14.7 of 24        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, or in a valid 25        stalking no contact order, which is authorized under   HB2815- 5 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1        the laws of another state, tribe, or United States 2        territory; and 3        (2) the violation occurs after the offender has been 4    served notice of the contents of the order, under the 5    Stalking No Contact Order Act, Article 112A of the Code of 6    Criminal Procedure of 1963, or any substantially similar 7    statute of another state, tribe, or United States 8    territory, or otherwise has acquired actual knowledge of 9    the contents of the order.10    A stalking no contact order issued by a state, tribal, or 11territorial court shall be deemed valid if the issuing court 12had jurisdiction over the parties and matter under the law of 13the state, tribe, or territory. There shall be a presumption 14of validity when an order is certified and appears authentic 15on its face.16    (a-3) For purposes of this Section, a "stalking no contact 17order" may have been issued in a criminal or civil proceeding.18    (a-5) Failure to provide reasonable notice and opportunity 19to be heard shall be an affirmative defense to any charge or 20process filed seeking enforcement of a foreign stalking no 21contact order. 22    (b) Prosecution for a violation of a stalking no contact 23order shall not bar a concurrent prosecution for any other 24crime, including any crime that may have been committed at the 25time of the violation of the civil no contact order. 26    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to diminish   HB2815- 6 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful 2orders through civil or criminal contempt proceedings.3    (d) A defendant who directed the actions of a third party 4to violate this Section, under the principles of 5accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 6of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 7done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of 8the third party acting at the direction of the defendant. 9    (e) Sentence. Violation of a stalking no contact order is 10a Class A misdemeanor. Violation of a stalking no contact 11order is a Class 4 felony if the defendant has any prior 12conviction under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.4 or any prior 13conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for an 14offense that could be charged in this State as domestic 15battery or violation of an order of protection. Violation of a 16stalking no contact order is a Class 4 felony if the defendant 17has any prior conviction under Section 8-4, 9-1, 10-1, 10-2, 1810-3, 10-3.1, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.60, 12-3.05, 1912-3.3, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 20-1.1, or 24-1.2 or subsection (a-5) 20of Section 12-3.1, of a violation of any former law of this 21State that is substantially similar to any listed offense, or 22any prior conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for 23an offense that could be charged in this State as one of the 24offenses listed in this Section, when any of these offenses 25have been committed against a family or household member as 26defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of   HB2815- 7 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b11963. The court shall impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 2imprisonment for the respondent's second or subsequent 3violation of any stalking no contact order, unless the court 4explicitly finds that an increased penalty or such period of 5imprisonment would be manifestly unjust. In addition to any 6other penalties, the court may order the respondent to pay a 7fine as authorized under Section 5-9-1 of the Unified Code of 8Corrections or to make restitution to the victim under Section 95-5-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A violation of a 10stalking no contact order is a Class A misdemeanor for a first 11violation, and a Class 4 felony for a second or subsequent 12violation. 13(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18.) 14    Section 10. The Stalking No Contact Order Act is amended 15by changing Section 125 as follows: 16    (740 ILCS 21/125)17    Sec. 125. Violation. Violation of a stalking no contact 18order is a Class A misdemeanor. Violation of a stalking no 19contact order is a Class 4 felony if the defendant has any 20prior conviction under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.4 of the 21Criminal Code of 2012 or any prior conviction under the law of 22another jurisdiction for an offense that could be charged in 23this State as domestic battery or violation of an order of 24protection. Violation of a stalking no contact order is a   HB2815- 8 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1Class 4 felony if the defendant has any prior conviction under 2Section 8-4, 9-1, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-3.1, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 311-1.40, 11-1.60, 12-3.05, 12-3.3, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 20-1.1, or 424-1.2 or subsection (a-5) of Section 12-3.1 of the Criminal 5Code of 2012, of a violation of any former law of this State 6that is substantially similar to any listed offense, or any 7prior conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for an 8offense that could be charged in this State as one of the 9offenses listed in this Section, when any of these offenses 10have been committed against a family or household member as 11defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 121963. The court shall impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 13imprisonment for the respondent's second or subsequent 14violation of any stalking no contact order, unless the court 15explicitly finds that an increased penalty or such period of 16imprisonment would be manifestly unjust. In addition to any 17other penalties, the court may order the respondent to pay a 18fine as authorized under Section 5-9-1 of the Unified Code of 19Corrections or to make restitution to the victim under Section 205-5-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 21An initial knowing violation of a stalking no contact order is 22a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent knowing 23violation is a Class 4 felony.24(Source: P.A. 96-246, eff. 1-1-10.) 25    Section 15. The Civil No Contact Order Act is amended by   HB2815- 9 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1changing Section 219 as follows: 2    (740 ILCS 22/219)3    Sec. 219. Violation. Violation of a civil no contact order 4is a Class A misdemeanor. Violation of a civil no contact order 5is a Class 4 felony if the defendant has any prior conviction 6under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or 7any prior conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for 8an offense that could be charged in this State as domestic 9battery or violation of an order of protection. Violation of a 10civil no contact order is a Class 4 felony if the defendant has 11any prior conviction under Section 8-4, 9-1, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 1210-3.1, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.60, 12-3.05, 12-3.3, 1312-4, 12-4.3, 12-4.4, 12-4.6, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-13, 12-14, 1412-14.1, 12-16, 20-1.1, or 24-1.2 or subsection (a-5) of 15Section 12-3.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, of a violation of 16any former law of this State that is substantially similar to 17any listed offense, or any prior conviction under the law of 18another jurisdiction for an offense that could be charged in 19this State as one of the offenses listed in this Section, when 20any of these offenses have been committed against a family or 21household member as defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of 22Criminal Procedure of 1963. The court shall impose a minimum 23penalty of 24 hours imprisonment for the respondent's second 24or subsequent violation of any civil no contact order, unless 25the court explicitly finds that an increased penalty or such   HB2815- 10 -LRB104 08711 JRC 18765 b1period of imprisonment would be manifestly unjust. In addition 2to any other penalties, the court may order the respondent to 3pay a fine as authorized under Section 5-9-1 of the Unified 4Code of Corrections or to make restitution to the victim under 5Section 5-5-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 6A knowing violation of a civil no contact order is a Class A 7misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation is a Class 4 8felony.9(Source: P.A. 93-236, eff. 1-1-04.)